dictionaries/tr_TR/tr_TR.aff
LANG tr_TR
SET UTF-8
TRY İiIıŞşÇçĞğÜüÖö-qwertyuopasdfghjklzxcvbnmQWERTYUOPASDFGHJKLZXCVBNM'
FLAG num

SFX 0 N 1
SFX 0 0 eminle .

SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 imcilik .

SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 0 keninin .

SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 0 cilerdensin .

SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 0 şada .

SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 asyonlarındaki .

SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 0 malıda .

SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 0 ıncım .

SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 0 nişler .

SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 0 muşlar .

SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 0 çayız .

SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 0 lamamalıdır .

SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 0 kayası .

SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 eradan .

SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 eden .

SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 cesidir .

SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 0 hten .

SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 0 umlarla .

SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 0 etlerinizin .

SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 landırdın .

SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 ahi .

SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 mışta .

SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 0 tmesinler .

SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 0 ldamak .

SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 0 nmişlerdi .

SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 0 liliklerini .

SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 0 kliye .

SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 0 leşirsek .

SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 0 ıcıyken .

SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 0 ardaydım .

SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 0 yemiyoruz .

SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 0 lalık .

SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 0 ebilenlerdir .

SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 0 rmemeye .

SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 0 endirmektedir .

SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 0 iyorduk .

SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 0 memişiz .

SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 0 inti .

SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 0 anlardaki .

SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 0 lmışsa .

SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 0 rılmanın .

SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 0 labilineceği .

SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 0 eşimdi .

SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 0 suzlaşmasına .

SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 0 kleşecek .

SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 0 inkiler .

SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 0 illerden .

SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 0 ermişte .

SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 0 mlenmiş .

SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 0 ameydi .

SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 0 elendiğinde .

SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 0 emelerinin .

SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 0 t .

SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 0 lesindedir .

SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 0 ilmelisiniz .

SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 0 aharı .

SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 0 eştirirseniz .

SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 0 nışından .

SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 0 tmesiyle .

SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 0 tirildi .

SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 0 lliklerden .

SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 0 ptık .

SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 0 ırmamalı .

SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 0 amlılık .

SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 0 rü .

SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 0 bent .

SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 0 hamı .

SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 0 asıdırlar .

SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 0 imesini .

SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 0 tladı .

SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 0 aştırılışı .

SFX 71 N 1
SFX 71 0 bilecekmiş .

SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 0 tırdık .

SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 0 dirmiştik .

SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 0 ciklerime .

SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 0 tırıcıdan .

SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 0 atten .

SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 0 lüğünün .

SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 0 uğuyla .

SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 0 ntrik .

SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 0 ümlerle .

SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 0 ırmamayı .

SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 0 mekteydim .

SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 0 tlikten .

SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 0 leştirebilecek .

SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 0 dıracakmış .

SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 0 nunkilerden .

SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 0 ederse .

SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 0 şsındır .

SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 0 ata .

SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 0 resel .

SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 0 letçi .

SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 0 ncikli .

SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 0 gimizi .

SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 0 steni .

SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 0 lmazlara .

SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 0 üsüyüm .

SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 0 mlarındandır .

SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 0 mişliklerim .

SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 0 inlerle .

SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0 ştırılabilirse .

SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 ışız .

SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 lmaktaydı .

SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 ottur .

SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0 imlerimiz .

SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 isini .

SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 0 eymişte .

SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 törünü .

SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 rduğunu .

SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 ınınkini .

SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 tası .

SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 kardan .

SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 arınızında .

SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 0 aşmıyor .

SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 0 riyormuş .

SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 mlarındaki .

SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 0 yalarına .

SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 0 tırabiliyordu .

SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 0 ebiliyordum .

SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 0 larındım .

SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 alıkla .

SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 kleştirmekten .

SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 0 ineler .

SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 0 larındakilerin .

SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 0 lmezdi .

SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0 laşmayacağına .

SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 0 ahidir .

SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 0 rdandın .

SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 0 tüyle .

SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 lımmış .

SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 cimizdir .

SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 anlarda .

SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 yamayabilirsiniz .

SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 0 elerinkine .

SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 0 cağının .

SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 vereyim .

SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 nmiyorsa .

SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 eliktir .

SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 hasında .

SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 0 damasıdır .

SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 şlerdeki .

SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 0 tılarıydı .

SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 metresinde .

SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 ndırmışlardır .

SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 tırmalarla .

SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 0 gunun .

SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 şindedir .

SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 0 elilerle .

SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 nmışsanız .

SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 0 stinden .

SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 0 muna .

SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 0 laklar .

SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 0 dum .

SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 0 tiremiyorum .

SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 0 ellerde .

SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 0 lemiyordum .

SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 0 rmuşlar .

SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 0 ndırmıyor .

SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 0 oş .

SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 0 edende .

SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 0 ilemeyenler .

SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 0 orsa .

SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 0 danım .

SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 0 uğumuzdan .

SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 0 eceğini .

SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 0 tlendiği .

SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 0 ırmışa .

SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 0 rduğum .

SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 0 lleşmede .

SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 0 llarının .

SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 0 enlikte .

SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 0 ğumuz .

SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 0 rkiz .

SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 0 mayacakken .

SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 0 edilmemiş .

SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 0 naklarınızı .

SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 0 rabilsem .

SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 0 nmamızı .

SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 0 anca .

SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 0 ılabileceğine .

SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 0 rmaktır .

SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 0 lıydınız .

SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 0 uzlaştıran .

SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 0 kanını .

SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 0 uklu .

SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 0 fti .

SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 0 nışlara .

SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 0 eşmemişlerdir .

SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 0 sünün .

SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 0 ürsem .

SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 0 şabilir .

SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 0 yı .

SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 0 iydim .

SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 0 nkilerinin .

SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 0 aşırdı .

SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 0 ksüz .

SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 0 zlaştığına .

SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 0 unsan .

SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 0 stleriz .

SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 0 etmedikçe .

SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 0 yorlardı .

SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 0 ümüzdendir .

SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 0 ımdadır .

SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 0 ırmaya .

SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 0 yalarını .

SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 0 emişsin .

SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 0 aydık .

SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 0 anmalardan .

SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 0 leşiyorduk .

SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 0 inmişti .

SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 0 ayagörsün .

SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 0 kliyorsa .

SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 0 lmuyorsa .

SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 0 labilmektedir .

SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 0 abilirliğiyle .

SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 0 emeyenlerdir .

SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 0 plerinize .

SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 0 rımın .

SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 0 ürmüştü .

SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 0 ajlarımı .

SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 aklanarak .

SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 sünle .

SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 0 tıramaz .

SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 0 biyim .

SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 ageldikleri .

SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 cide .

SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 ladığımız .

SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 urmuş .

SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 türebilirsin .

SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 tirilme .

SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 rmışa .

SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 esimde .

SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 üsüne .

SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 eyebilmesi .

SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 ılığımızdan .

SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 eyeceğinde .

SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 hardır .

SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 ekken .

SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 klanır .

SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 tirebilmeyi .

SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 suzlaştırılması .

SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 ması .

SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 işimden .

SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 örünün .

SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0 ndırırsın .

SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 aşlarımıza .

SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 nosu .

SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 ariyle .

SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 net .

SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 landırabilir .

SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 inmesinden .

SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 kliğine .

SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0 meyeceğinizi .

SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 emelerinden .

SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 tilidir .

SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 urucu .

SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 kmüş .

SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 lakadır .

SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0 atmamla .

SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 abilmelerinde .

SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 kti .

SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 uklukların .

SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 ıtlık .

SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 nkilerle .

SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 ğigiller .

SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 0 ızlarının .

SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 0 aklanır .

SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 0 rlardır .

SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 0 kum .

SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 0 imlerimize .

SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0 ifinin .

SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 rmazsam .

SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0 tüsüne .

SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0 lıktanmış .

SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 0 sabında .

SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 0 laştırıcılar .

SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 0 lüden .

SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 ke .

SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0 ellerdeki .

SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 ojisiyle .

SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 0 yabilirim .

SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 0 yocu .

SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 canlılık .

SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 ınalar .

SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 syonlardan .

SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 acaksa .

SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 0 elerime .

SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 0 raklar .

SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 0 zlendim .

SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 dırılmışı .

SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 0 culuğun .

SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 0 ttıktan .

SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 abilirlerse .

SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 0 lenmektir .

SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 0 sizliklerdir .

SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 0 rilme .

SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 alaştırılmış .

SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 0 elleşerek .

SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 0 ndıklarının .

SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 0 amayı .

SFX 300 N 1
SFX 300 0 yasından .

SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 llaşacak .

SFX 302 N 1
SFX 302 0 adıklarını .

SFX 303 N 1
SFX 303 0 yıktı .

SFX 304 N 1
SFX 304 0 kılıcı .

SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 ğizden .

SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 dığınızdaki .

SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 aşacağınızı .

SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 0 başıyım .

SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 0 tmıyordu .

SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 0 mcılığı .

SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 0 özleri .

SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0 eştirelim .

SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 0 yabildiğinden .

SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0 şlaradır .

SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 0 ılardırlar .

SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0 imsel .

SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 0 leştirecekler .

SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 geleni .

SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 0 ınışın .

SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 tisinden .

SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 nığım .

SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 dırılmasına .

SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 0 lmesiydi .

SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 zalar .

SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 0 yebilecekti .

SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 0 nciliğe .

SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 vist .

SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 0 ttirebilirsin .

SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0 ardayken .

SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 0 datın .

SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 0 tselerdi .

SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 rime .

SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 0 irilmez .

SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 0 ekleriniz .

SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 llanma .

SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 şıklardır .

SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 0 remeyecektir .

SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 0 unduğunu .

SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 kleştirmekle .

SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 tük .

SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 0 ştırtıp .

SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 0 lleştiriyor .

SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0 ılası .

SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 0 tıramayacaklarını .

SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 0 tirilmesinde .

SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 0 psiyon .

SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 ecilerinin .

SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 0 anmalarından .

SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 0 layabilmek .

SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 ebilirliktir .

SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 lendirdiğin .

SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 elliğinde .

SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 lemesine .

SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 zlığınızı .

SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 eksiniz .

SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0 ışlarımdan .

SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 lendirilmesini .
